Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201960-620.01
Former military vehicle, defined.

Former military vehicle means a motor vehicle that was manufactured for use in any country's military forces and is maintained to accurately represent its military design and markings, regardless of the vehicle's size or weight, but is no longer used, or never was used, by a military force.

Laws 2019, LB156, § 18.